Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1524
Electioneering; dissemination of information or materials; circulation of petitions; prohibited acts; penalty; observed violation; warning.

(1) No judge or clerk of election or precinct or district inspector shall do any electioneering or disseminate information or materials advertising or advocating for or against any ballot measure while acting as an election official.

(2) No person shall do any electioneering, disseminate information or materials advertising or advocating for or against any ballot measure, or circulate petitions within any polling place or any building designated for voters to cast ballots by the election commissioner or county clerk pursuant to the Election Act while the polling place or building is set up for voters to cast ballots or within two hundred feet of the entrances to any such polling place or building except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) No person shall do any electioneering or disseminate information or materials advertising or advocating for or against any ballot measure within two hundred feet of or circulate petitions within twenty-five feet of any secure ballot drop-box:

(a) For special elections by mail conducted pursuant to section 32-953, between the date ballots are mailed and the deadline for the receipt of ballots; and

(b) For all other elections, between the date ballots for early voting are mailed and the deadline for the receipt of ballots.

(4) Subject to any local ordinance, a person may display yard signs on private real property within two hundred feet of a polling place or building designated for voters to cast ballots or a secure ballot drop-box if the property is not under common ownership with the property on which the polling place, building, or secure ballot drop-box is located.

(5) If an election official or law enforcement officer observes a person violating this section, the election official or law enforcement officer shall inform such person that the person is in violation of this section and warn such person to cease such violation. Any person who, after being warned, persists in violating this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 423;

Laws 2006, LB 940, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB874, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 65;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 49;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 61;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 43.
April 16, 2026